Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6904
Base year, defined.

Base year means the year immediately preceding the year of application, except that if the year of application is 2021, the base year is either 2019 or 2020, whichever year the applicant had the larger number of equivalent employees at the qualified location.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 4.